src/fst/stems/interjections.lexc
LEXICON Interjection
aj         Interj+tag;!'ay!'
dankon     Interj+tag;!'Thank you!'
ek         Interj+tag;!'get going, go away!'
fek        Interj+tag;!'shit!'
ĝis        Interj+tag;!'goodbye'
ho         Interj+tag;!'oh!'
ja         Interj+tag;!'emphatic particle'
nedankinde Interj+tag;!'you're welcome / no problem'
sal        Interj+tag;!'hi'
saluton    Interj+tag;!'hello'
um         Interj+tag;!'(filler word)'


LEXICON Interj+tag
+Interj:    #;
